Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2107.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 46, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 46-232, to read: START_STATUTE46-232. Use of supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits; prohibited purchases; waiver; definition A. The director of the department of economic security shall request a waiver from the United States department of agriculture to do both of the following: 1. Exclude fast food from the supplemental nutrition assistance program. 2. Include vitamins in the supplemental nutrition assistance program. B. If the waiver is granted as prescribed in subsection A of this section, the director shall prohibit enrollees in the supplemental nutrition assistance program from using program benefits to purchase fast food and allow enrollees to use program benefits to purchase vitamins.  If the waiver is not granted, the director shall request a waiver annually until the waiver is granted. C. For the purposes of this section, "Fast Food" means a type of mass-produced food that is designed for commercial resale with a strong priority placed on speed of service. END_STATUTE